test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-myenster_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - myenster: # 1B
    myenster+N+Sg+Nom: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Gen: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Acc: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Ill: myen´sterân
    myenster+N+Sg+Loc: myen´sterist
    myenster+N+Sg+Com: myen´steráin
    myenster+N+Sg+Abe: myensterttáá
    myenster+N+Ess:    myen´sterin
    myenster+N+Par:    myen´sterid
    myenster+N+Pl+Nom: myen´stereh
    myenster+N+Pl+Gen: myen´sterij
    myenster+N+Pl+Acc: myen´sterijd
    myenster+N+Pl+Ill: myen´steráid
    myenster+N+Pl+Loc: myen´sterijn
    myenster+N+Pl+Com: myen´sterijguin
    myenster+N+Pl+Abe: myen´sterijttáá
